Missouri, session 2026, SB1193.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 1.2030, to read as
follows:
1.2030. 1. (1) All state departments are prohibited
from expending funds, allocating funds, or making any other
gifts or expenditures for intradepartmental programs,
staffing, or other initiatives associated with "diversity,
equity, and inclusion", "diversity, inclusion, and
belonging", or any other initiative that promotes the
differential treatment of any individual or group of
individuals based on race, color, religion, sex, gender,
sexual orientation, ethnicity, national origin, or ancestry
including, but not limited to:
(a) The concept that disparities between groups are
solely the result of oppression;
(b) Collective guilt ideologies;
(c) Intersectional or divisive identity activism;
(d) The limiting of freedom of conscience, thought, or
speech;

SB 1193 2
(e) Any effort to manipulate or otherwise influence
the composition of employees with reference to race, sex,
color, or ethnicity, other than ensuring colorblind and race-
neutral hiring in accordance with state and federal
antidiscrimination laws; or
(f) Any effort to promote differential treatment of or
provide special benefits to a person based on his or her
race, color, or ethnicity.
(2) Such prohibited policies and programs shall not
include:
(a) Policies or procedures approved in writing by the
attorney general for the sole purpose of ensuring compliance
with any applicable court order or state or federal law; nor
(b) Training, programming, or activities developed by
an attorney licensed in the state of Missouri and approved
in writing by the attorney general for the sole purpose of
ensuring compliance with any applicable court order or state
or federal law.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 of this section
shall not prohibit state departments from any of the
following:
(1) Following federal and state employment and
antidiscrimination laws; or
(2) Complying with the Americans with Disabilities
Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 12101, et seq.
3. No state department shall mandate, require, or
incentivize private sector employers to implement programs
or initiatives described in subsection 1 of this section as
a condition of awarding a state contract.
4. A person may notify the attorney general of a
violation or potential violation of this section by a state
department. The attorney general may file suit for a writ

SB 1193 3
of mandamus compelling a violating state department to
comply with this section.
✓